Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-820
Schools; contract with employees of another district, prohibited; penalty.

No school board or board of education in the State of Nebraska shall enter into a contract of employment with a teacher or administrator who is already under contract with another school board or board of education within this state covering a part or all of the same time of performance as the contract with such other board. No person under contract with any school board or board of education shall enter into such a contract of employment with another school board or board of education for part or all of the same time of performance as his or her contract with such other board. Upon the receipt of a sworn statement, made for or authorized by such other board, that a person employed by any board in such capacity is already under contract of employment with such other board for part or all of the same time of performance as such person is, has been, or will be so employed by the board, the board shall immediately cease payment of any salary to such teacher or administrator. Any member of a board of education or school board who knowingly violates any of the provisions of this section shall be individually and personally liable for any damages sustained by the other school district.

Laws 1943, c. 201, § 3, p. 672;

R.S.1943, § 79-2148;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 351, p. 808;

Laws 1971, LB 802, § 9;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1251;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 450.